Nebraska, session 109, LB284.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB284 LB284
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $500,000 from the
Health and Human Services Cash Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $500,000 from
the Health and Human Services Cash Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department
of Health and Human Services, for Program 514, for state aid to a
nonprofit organization holding a certificate of exemption under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 providing health care
screening, sports competitions, educational opportunities, and leadership
training for persons with developmental or intellectual disabilities.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$500,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such
purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program for
FY2026-27 $500,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for
such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-